Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2010.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5037YH (3) 91 ak/jh H.F. 2010 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âIowa Pharmaceutical Advertising Transparency and 2 Consumer Protection Actâ. 3 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 714.30 Pharmaceutical advertising ââ 4 restrictions. 5 1. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise 6 requires: 7 a. âGovernment-sponsoredâ means funded in whole or in part 8 by a federal, state, local government, or an agency thereof. 9 b. âPharmaceutical companyâ means any entity that 10 manufactures, markets, distributes, or sells prescription 11 drugs. 12 c. âPrescription drugâ means the same as defined in section 13 155A.3. 14 d. âTelevision advertisementâ means any video-based 15 advertisement promoting a prescription drug or vaccine, 16 broadcast via traditional television or a digital streaming 17 platform. 18 2. Beginning January 1, 2027, any pharmaceutical 19 company-sponsored television advertisement aired in this state 20 must comply with all of following: 21 a. Clearly and audibly state the average retail price for 22 a standard thirty-day supply or the cost of a full course of 23 treatment, whichever is higher. 24 b. Disclose all known common and serious side effects and 25 contraindications associated with the prescription drug or 26 vaccine, in plain and understandable language with equal visual 27 and auditory prominence. 28 c. Not be aired for any prescription drug until at least 29 twelve months have passed since the date of initial approval by 30 the federal food and drug administration. 31 3. Beginning January 1, 2027, any government-sponsored 32 television advertisement aired in this state must disclose all 33 known common and serious side effects and contraindications 34 associated with the prescription drug or vaccine, in 35 -1- LSB 5037YH (3) 91 ak/jh 1/ 4 H.F. 2010 plain and understandable language, with equal visual and 1 auditory prominence. This requirement applies to any 2 government-sponsored television advertisement of prescription 3 drugs or vaccines, regardless of the pharmaceutical company 4 that manufactures the prescription drug or vaccine. 5 4. A violation of this section constitutes an unlawful 6 practice pursuant to section 714.16, and the attorney general 7 has all the powers enumerated in that section to enforce the 8 provisions of this section, unless otherwise stated in this 9 section. In enforcing the provisions of this section, the 10 attorney general may do any of the following: 11 a. Notwithstanding section 714.16, subsection 7, seek an 12 assessment by a district court of civil fines not exceeding 13 fifty thousand dollars per violation. In the case of a 14 continuing violation, each day of the continuing violation 15 constitutes a separate violation. 16 b. Request that a district court order a cease and desist or 17 other injunctive relief as appropriate. 18 c. Publicly disclose violative conduct for consumer 19 awareness via notice or post on the attorney generalâs internet 20 site. 21 5. An enforcement action taken pursuant to this section 22 shall be in accordance with due process of law and subject to 23 appeal to the district court pursuant to sections 17A.19 and 24 17A.20. 25 6. The attorney general may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 26 17A as necessary or appropriate to implement the purposes of 27 this section. 28 7. Any moneys collected under this section, including 29 civil penalties, costs, attorney fees, or amounts which 30 are specifically directed, shall be paid into the consumer 31 education and litigation fund established under section 32 714.16C. 33